District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.224

Reporting requirements.

Beginning January 2, 2015, the grant-managing entity shall submit an annual report to the Mayor and the Council of all District funds allocated, which includes:

(1)

Detailed subgrantee data;

(2)

Performance measures and performance outcomes under each subgrant;

(3)

The specific services provided under each subgrant;

(4)

The entity providing the services, if one other than the subgrantee;

(5)

The time period of delivery of the services;

(6)

The type of service provided;

(7)

The actual amount paid for the services; and

(8)

The amount of other expenditures under the subgrant, if any.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1015, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.